Wisconsin, session 2025, AB845.
do enact as follows:AB845,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB845,26Section 2. 20.115 (7) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB845,3,9720.115 (7) (cm) Sustainable agriculture grants. As a continuing 8appropriation, the amounts in the schedule for sustainable agriculture grants 9under s. 93.60.AB845,310Section 3. 93.60 of the statutes is created to read:AB845,3,151193.60 Sustainable agriculture grant program. (1) Except as provided in 12sub. (2), for the purposes of reducing fossil fuels used in farming and increasing the 13amount of carbon stored on farmland, the department may award grants from the 14appropriation under s. 20.115 (7) (cm) to agricultural producers to do any of the 15following:AB845,3,2016(a) Implement on-site fossil fuel input efficiency measures, including any 17activity or technology that reduces the amount of fuel, electricity, water, fossil fuel-18based fertilizer, or fossil fuel-based pesticide that is used per unit of agricultural 19output, and including by adopting alternative fuel technologies such as wind or 20solar power.AB845,3,2221(b) Implement above-ground carbon sequestration practices such as planting 22hedgerows, windrows, riparian buffers, or woody plantings, including fruit trees.AB845,4,323(c) Implement an activity or technology that maintains or enhances the 1quantity of organic carbon in the soil, including by cover cropping, using no-till or 2low-till practices, applying manure, applying biochar, or using managed grazing 3practices.AB845,4,54(d) Develop a conservation management plan that outlines the producer’s 5plan for carbon reduction or sequestration.AB845,4,136(2) The department may not award a grant under this section for a project 7that occurs on land participating in a land retirement program or on commercial 8forest land or for an aquaculture-based project. In addition, the department may 9not award a grant under this section to a person who is eligible for the state-federal 10conservation reserve enhancement program under s. 93.70, unless the person has 11first applied for enrollment in that program, or to a person who is eligible for any 12other state, federal, or local grant for the same conservation actions, unless the 13person has first applied for that grant.AB845,4,2214(3) In prioritizing grant recipients, the department shall seek to maximize 15the total reduction in atmospheric carbon dioxide equivalents per dollar awarded by 16leveraging other nonstate public or private funding. The department shall also 17prioritize practices, activities, and technologies that both improve air or water 18quality in this state and provide agronomic benefits. The department shall also 19seek to ensure that grants are provided to agricultural producers that are located in 20different regions of the state and that represent different types of agricultural 21enterprises and shall seek to ensure that small- and medium-sized agricultural 22enterprises are included in the grant program.AB845,5,623(4) For purposes of this section and rules promulgated under this section, 1storing one ton of carbon dioxide equivalents in soil or standing trees for 100 years 2shall be considered equal to avoiding one ton of carbon dioxide equivalents 3emissions. Carbon dioxide equivalents stored for less than 100 years must be 4annualized linearly, with one-ton year carbon dioxide equivalents storage having 5one-hundredth the relative value as the emission of one ton of carbon dioxide 6equivalents.AB845,5,157(5) The department may use up to 20 percent of the amount appropriated 8under s. 20.115 (7) (cm) to create educational campaigns that raise awareness of the 9grant program under this section; to provide technical assistance to grant 10applicants in cooperation with the University of Wisconsin-Extension, the natural 11resources conservation service of the federal department of agriculture, the 12department of natural resources, and county land and water conservation 13departments; to cover the cost of administering the program under this section; and 14to develop programs and models to assist with the grant prioritization process 15under this section.AB845,5,1816(6) A person who receives a grant under this section may use the grant to 17make down payments on equipment or for other types of loans related to the 18purpose of the grant.AB845,6,219(7) Grants awarded under sub. (1) (c) for activities or technologies that have 20an uncertain storage life may include ongoing annual payments for the previous 21year’s storage or upfront cumulative payments based on the expected storage in 22future years. Grants that include upfront payments for future benefits must be 1conditioned to include penalties for default due to negligence on the part of the 2grant recipient.AB845,6,93(8) The department may require a grant recipient to allow access to the 4property on which the grant project is located, with reasonable notice, to monitor 5the impacts of the project. All grant recipients shall allow information about their 6projects to be made available to the public. The department shall maintain a public 7list of all grant recipients, as well as other pertinent information, including total 8state dollars spent or borrowed and the impact on total atmospheric carbon dioxide 9equivalents emissions.AB845,6,1410(9) The department, in consultation with the University of Wisconsin-11Extension, the natural resources conservation service of the federal department of 12agriculture, the department of natural resources, and county land and water 13conservation departments, shall promulgate rules to administer the program under 14this section.AB845,7,415(10) No later than January 1 of the year following the year in which a grant is 16first awarded under this section, and no later than January 1 of each subsequent 17odd-numbered year, the department shall submit a report on the program under 18this section to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the 19appropriate standing committees under s. 13.172 (3). The report shall document 20the nonstate matching funds that were used by grant recipients; the total state 21dollars awarded under the program; the total state dollars spent on providing 22technical assistance, educational campaigns, and administration; the quantity of 23carbon dioxide equivalents emissions avoided; the quantity of carbon stored for 1projects under sub. (1) (c); and the total impact on atmospheric carbon dioxide 2equivalents emissions of all activities funded under the program to date and 3expected over the life of each project by the categories described under sub. (1) (a) to 4(c).AB845,7,65(11) An offer of a grant under this section shall be considered a bona fide offer 6of cost-sharing.AB845,7,77